test/src/morphology/A-ouki_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - ouki: # adjectives 197 'eng /est auklik/fin' - full paradigm
     ouki+A+Sg+Nom: ouki
     ouki+A+Sg+Gen: ōkiz
     ouki+A+Sg+Par: ōkizt
     ouki+A+Sg+Dat: ōkizõn
     ouki+A+Sg+Ins: ōkizõks
     ouki+A+Sg+Ill: ōkizõ
     ouki+A+Sg+Ela: ōkizõst
     ouki+A+Pl+Nom: oukizt
     ouki+A+Pl+Gen: oukizt
     ouki+A+Pl+Par: ōkiži
     ouki+A+Pl+Dat: oukiztõn
     ouki+A+Pl+Ins: oukiztõks
     ouki+A+Pl+Ill: ōkižiz
     ouki+A+Pl+Ela: ōkižist
